Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2941
Determination of voting power of patron member.

The articles of organization or bylaws may provide additional voting power be allocated for each patron member for:

(1) Actual, estimated, or potential patronage or any combination thereof;

(2) Equity allocated or held by a patron member in the limited cooperative association; or

(3) Any combination of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 41.